Washington statutes.
RCW 16.50.150

Religious freedom—Ritual slaughter defined as humane.

Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to prohibit, abridge, or in any way hinder the religious freedom of any person or group. Notwithstanding any other provisions of this chapter, ritual slaughter and the handling or other preparation of livestock for ritual slaughter is defined as humane.

[ 1967 c 31 s 10.]